Wyoming, session 2025, SF0068.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(ii)(intro) and by
creating a new paragraph (xlvi) is amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:
SF0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0362

(ii) Subject to paragraph (xlvi) of this
subsection, property of the state of Wyoming that is owned
and used primarily for a governmental purpose is exempt
from property taxation. The following property is not owned
and used primarily for a governmental purpose:

(xlvi) Lands owned by the state of Wyoming are
exempt from property taxation regardless of the use of the
lands. Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent the taxation
of any other property, including improvements to land, that
are not owned and used primarily for a governmental purpose
as provided in paragraph (ii) of this subsection. This
paragraph is repealed January 1, 2027.

Section 2. The property tax exemption provided in
W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi) as created in section 1 of this act
shall apply to the tax year beginning January 1, 2025.

Section 3.

(a) There is created the government property task
force to consist of four (4) members appointed by the
SF0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0362
speaker of the house, four (4) members appointed by the
president of the senate and two (2) members appointed by
the governor.

(b) The task force shall:

(i) Review the taxability of government property
considering the historical taxation of government property
and the impacts of the recent Wyoming supreme court
decision dealing with the taxability of state lands;

(ii) Review the exemptions for different types
of government property including federal, state, municipal,
county, school and other public property;

(iii) Make recommendations regarding the
taxability of state lands and other government property.
The recommendations may include any recommendations to
amend the exemptions for government property among the
different types of government property to make those
exemptions uniform and to clarify the definition of
"governmental purpose".

SF0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0362
(c) Not later than October 1, 2025 the task force
shall report to the governor, the joint revenue interim
committee and the joint agriculture, state and public lands
and water resources interim committee on the activities of
the task force and any recommendations of the task force
under this section.

(d) The legislative members of the task force shall
receive compensation, per diem and travel expenses in the
manner and amount prescribed by W.S. 28-5-101. Task force
members who are not legislators and are not state employees
shall receive the compensation, per diem and mileage paid
to members of the Wyoming legislature under W.S. 28-5-101.

(e) The task force shall be staffed by the
legislative service office. The department of revenue and
the office of state lands and investments shall provide
assistance to the task force upon request.

(f) The task force shall terminate June 30, 2026.

Section 4.

SF0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0362
(a) There is appropriated twenty thousand dollars
($20,000.00) from the general fund to the governor's office
to pay compensation, mileage and per diem for
nonlegislative members of the task force. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2026. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2026.

(b) There is appropriated forty-five thousand dollars
($45,000.00) from the general fund to the legislative
service office to pay for salary, mileage and per diem of
legislative members appointed to the task force. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2026. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2026.

SF0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0362
Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0068